Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB634.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 5 of this Act:
(1) "Advisory committee" means a committee consisting of members selected by each
chamber using the process and performing the duties outlined in Section 5 of this
Act;
(2) "Chamber" means either the Senate or the House of Representatives of the
Kentucky General Assembly;
(3) "Commissioner" means a person selected by a commissioning resolution of the
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1199
General Assembly to represent this Commonwealth at any interstate convention;
(4) "Commissioning resolution" means the joint resolution adopted by the House of
Representatives and Senate of the General Assembly which sets forth the names
of the appointed commissioners, their commissions, and instructions;
(5) "Delegation" means the group of commissioners and interim commissioners
chosen by the General Assembly to attend any interstate convention; and
(6) "Interim commissioner" means a person selected by the advisory committee
pursuant to Section 5 of this Act to fill a vacancy in the delegation.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If an Article V convention is convened and this Commonwealth is a participant,
the General Assembly shall adopt a commissioning resolution naming five (5)
commissioners to represent this Commonwealth in the convention.
(2) The commissioning resolution shall include but not be limited to the following
components:
(a) A commissioner shall not vote for or otherwise promote any change to the
traditional convention rule of decision on the floor and in the committee of
the whole, including that each state has one (1) vote; and
(b) A commissioner shall not vote in favor of any proposed amendment that
would alter the text of the specific guarantees of individual liberty
established by the Constitution of the United States, including the original
Constitution, the Bill of Rights, and the Thirteenth, Fourteenth, Fifteenth,
Nineteenth, Twenty-Third, Twenty-Fourth, and Twenty-Sixth Amendments
to the Constitution of the United States.
(3) If a commissioning resolution is passed pursuant to an Article V convention of
the states to propose amendments to the Constitution of the United States, it shall
clearly state the scope of the commissioners' authority, which shall be limited by:
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1199
(a) The subject matter enumerated in the thirty-four (34) state resolutions in
application to Congress to call the convention; and
(b) Any additional instructions from the General Assembly.
(4) The General Assembly may provide additional instructions at any time by
subsequent joint resolution, a copy of which the Clerk of the House of
Representatives shall provide to each commissioner and to the advisory
committee.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) At the time of their appointment, and throughout their commissionable service,
each of the five (5) commissioners shall:
(a) Have been a United States citizen for not less than five (5) years;
(b) Be a legal resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for not less than five
(5) years;
(c) Be at least twenty-five (25) years old;
(d) Be an active registered voter in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(e) Not be registered or have been required to register as a federal lobbyist at
any time within the last five (5) years;
(f) Not currently be a federal employee or federal contractor, nor have been a
federal employee or federal contractor within the last ten (10) years, but
may be a member of the United States Armed Forces;
(g) Not have held a federal elected or appointed office at any time within the
last ten (10) years;
(h) Not have had any felony convictions for any crime, including crimes
involving moral turpitude, in any jurisdiction within the last ten (10) years;
and
(i) Not hold a statewide office while performing the duties of commissioner or
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1199
interim commissioner. For the purposes of this section, a position as a state
legislator shall not be deemed a statewide office.
(2) (a) Each commissioner shall, before exercising any function of the position,
execute the following oath in writing: "I do solemnly swear or affirm that I
accept and will act according to the limits of authority specified in my
commission and any present or subsequent instructions from the Kentucky
General Assembly. I understand that violating this oath may subject me to
penalties provided by law. I understand that I may be recalled or suspended
from my duties by the General Assembly or the advisory committee."
(b) A commissioner's executed oath shall be filed with the Secretary of State.
(3) After a commissioner's executed oath is filed with the Secretary of State, the
Clerk of the House of Representatives shall provide to the commissioner an
official copy of the executed oath and the commissioning resolution, which
together shall serve as the commissioner's credentials.
(4) (a) A commissioner or interim commissioner may be recalled or removed at any
time for any reason by a joint resolution of the General Assembly, or if the
General Assembly is not in session, may be recalled and suspended from his
or her duties by the advisory committee, pending a vote of the General
Assembly the next time it is in session and authorized to vote on the issue.
(b) A commissioner or interim commissioner shall be recalled or suspended by
the advisory committee pursuant to a determination under Section 5 of this
Act that he or she has exceeded the scope of his or her authority.
(5) Any commissioner vacancy shall be filled by the advisory committee's selection of
an interim commissioner until the General Assembly selects a permanent
replacement.
(6) A commissioner shall receive the same compensation and allowance for expenses
as a member of the House of Representatives of this Commonwealth.
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1199
Compensation for the commissioner shall be prorated for length of time served.
(7) A commissioner or an interim commissioner shall not accept, during his or her
time of service, any gift or benefit with a combined value of more than fifty
dollars ($50), other than from a member of his or her family and of the kind
customarily granted by a member of one's family. As used in this subsection, the
term "gift or benefit" shall be construed liberally to include current and future
loans, lodging, food, offer of prospective employment, and other actual and
prospective benefits. An employer's decision to continue paying a commissioner's
current salary shall not be construed as a gift.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The commissioners within the delegation, including any interim
commissioners filling a vacancy, shall choose from among them a person
to:
1. Chair the delegation;
2. Cast the state's vote on the convention floor; and
3. Speak to the media on behalf of the delegation.
(b) If the delegation so decides, the same person may exercise any two (2) or all
three (3) functions listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection. The delegation
may, at any time, designate a different commissioner to perform any of the
functions listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) Each commissioner shall take care to avoid communicating the impression to any
person outside the delegation that the delegation is divided on a question on
which the delegation has taken a formal position, including but not limited to
casting a vote.
(3) A commissioner who is not the commissioner designated to communicate with the
media on behalf of the delegation shall not communicate with the media about
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1199
convention business during the convention or during any temporary recess or
temporary adjournment.
(4) A commissioner who violates subsection (2) or (3) of this section may be
suspended or recalled by the advisory committee or the General Assembly.
(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not be construed to prevent a
commissioner from presenting his or her opinions to the convention or debating a
matter at the convention on which his or her delegation has not formally taken a
position.
(6) (a) The quorum for a decision by the delegation shall be a majority present and
voting at the time the question is called. Decisions may include but not be
limited to the:
1. Designation of commissioners for particular duties; and
2. Determination of how the state's vote shall be cast.
(b) A decision shall not be made and a vote shall not be cast if less than a
majority of the delegation votes on the question.
(7) If a quorum is present, the decision of the delegation shall be that of the majority
of those present and voting at the time the question is called.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The advisory committee shall consist of the following members:
(a) A member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(b) A member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives; and
(c) A member of the General Assembly:
1. Nominated by both the Speaker of the House and the President of the
Senate; and
2. Approved by the majority of those voting in each chamber.
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1199
(2) The advisory committee shall select one (1) of its members as chair.
(3) A commissioner may request that the advisory committee advise him or her
whether a prospective action by a commissioner would violate the commissioning
resolution or any subsequent instructions.
(4) The advisory committee shall:
(a) Communicate to the commissioner requesting advice pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section by any appropriate means a determination within twenty-
four (24) hours of receiving the request; and
(b) Have the authority to hire staff and develop appropriate procedures and
mechanisms for monitoring the convention, its committees, and
subcommittees.
(5) If the advisory committee has reason to believe that a commissioner or interim
commissioner has exceeded the scope of his or her authority, the advisory
committee shall notify the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the
President of the Senate.
(6) Upon request for a determination by the Speaker of the House and the President
of the Senate whether a commissioner or interim commissioner has exceeded the
scope of his or her authority, the advisory committee shall issue a determination
whether the commissioner or interim commissioner exceeded his or her authority.
The determination shall be expeditiously made and immediately communicated to
the person requesting it.
(7) Upon a determination that a commissioner or interim commissioner has exceeded
the scope of his or her authority pursuant to this section, the advisory committee
shall notify the Speaker of the House and the President of the Senate for further
action pursuant to subsection (4) of Section 3 of this Act.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:20 AM Jacketed